Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-513
Licensed professional; nonresident; practice of audiology or speech-language pathology; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act shall be construed to prevent or restrict (1) a qualified person licensed in this state from engaging in the profession for which he or she is licensed if he or she does not present himself or herself to be an audiologist or speech-language pathologist or (2) the performance of audiology or speech-language pathology services in this state by any person not a resident of this state who is not licensed either under the act or in a member state of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, if (a) such services are performed for not more than thirty days in any calendar year, (b) such person meets the qualifications and requirements for application for licensure under the act, (c) such person is working under the supervision of a person licensed in Nebraska to practice speech-language pathology or audiology or under the supervision of a person licensed in a member state practicing speech-language pathology or audiology in Nebraska under the compact privilege, and (d) such person registers with the board prior to initiation of professional services.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 15;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 16;

Laws 1990, LB 828, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,188;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 198;

Laws 2021, LB14, § 1.

Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, see section 38-4101.